North Dakota, session 69, HB1524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-60 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Regional planning council grants - Purpose.
The department may award grants to regional planning councils under chapter 54 - 40.1 to suppor t
local and regional implementation of state-authorized programs and initiatives, including housing,
regional workforce, rural catalyst, local food and grocery, and other state-authorized programs, subject
to legislative appropriations. The department may approve grants to support program implementation,
resource development, and efforts to attract and leverage public or private investment in local and
regional areas of the state.

H. B. NO. 1524 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1524.
House Vote: Yeas 70 Nays 20 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 36 Nays 10 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State